test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VAI_VV_IND_boodwe_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VAI - VV - boodwe :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4   5
  #per	neg     num     mod periph
     
     #this is pulled from book (p 232)
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+boodwe+VAI: nboodwe
     2+boodwe+VAI: gboodwe

     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     boodwe+VAI+3: boodwe
     boodwe+VAI+X: boodwem

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 3
     1+boodwe+VAI+1+Pl: nboodwemi
     2+boodwe+VAI+1+Pl: gboodwemi
     2+boodwe+VAI+2+Pl: gboodwem
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     boodwe+VAI+3+3+4: boodwewan
     boodwe+VAI+3+3+Pl: boodwewag

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+boodwe+VAI+Prt: nboodwenaaba
     2+boodwe+VAI+Prt: gboodwenaaba
     1+boodwe+VAI+Dub: nboodwenaadig
     2+boodwe+VAI+Dub: gboodwenaadig

     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     boodwe+VAI+3+Prt: boodwewba #w-del-less
     #boodwe+VAI+3+Prt: boodweba #book
     boodwe+VAI+3+Dub: boodwewdig #w-del-less
     #boodwe+VAI+3+Prt: boodwedig #book
     boodwe+VAI+X+Prt: boodwemba 
     boodwe+VAI+X+Dub: boodwemdig
     boodwe+VAI+3+Prt+Dub: boodwewgoba #cons assumption -w '3' still present
     #boodwe+VAI+3+Prt+Dub: boodwegba #book
     boodwe+VAI+3+4+Prt+Dub: boodwen'goba #'
     boodwe+VAI+3+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: boodwewaagba
     boodwe+VAI+X+Prt+Dub: boodwemgoba

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 3, 4
     1+boodwe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: nboodwemnaaba
     2+boodwe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: gboodwemnaaba
     2+boodwe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt: gboodwemwaaba
     1+boodwe+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: nboodwemnaadig
     2+boodwe+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: gboodwemnaadig
     2+boodwe+VAI+2+Pl+Dub: gboodwemwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5
     boodwe+VAI+3+Prt+3+4: boodwewbaniin #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+3+Prt+3+4: boodwebniin   #book
     boodwe+VAI+3+Prt+3+Pl: boodwewbaniig #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+3+Prt+3+Pl: boodwebniig  #book
     boodwe+VAI+3+Dub+3+4: boodwewdigenan #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+3+Dub+3+4: boodwedgenan   #book
     boodwe+VAI+3+Dub+3+Pl: boodwewdigenag #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+3+Dub+3+Pl: boodwedgenag  #book

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+boodwe+VAI+Neg: nboodwesii
     2+boodwe+VAI+Neg: gboodwesii

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+3: boodwesii
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+X: boodwesiim

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 2, 3
     1+boodwe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: nboodwesiimi
     2+boodwe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: gboodwesiimi
     2+boodwe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl: gboodwesiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 2, 5
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+3+4: boodwesiiwan
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+3+Pl: boodwesiiwag

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+boodwe+VAI+Neg+Prt: nboodwesiinaaba
     2+boodwe+VAI+Neg+Prt: gboodwesiinaaba
     1+boodwe+VAI+Neg+Dub: nboodwesiinaadig
     2+boodwe+VAI+Neg+Dub: gboodwesiinaadig

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: boodwesiiwba #w-del-less
     #boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: boodwesiiba #book
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+Dub: boodwesiiwdig #w-del-less
     #boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: boodwesiidig #book
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt: boodwesiimba 
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+X+Dub: boodwesiimdig
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub: boodwesiiwgoba #cons assumption of -w `3' being present
     #boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub: boodwesiigba #book
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+4+Prt+Dub: boodwesiin'goba #'
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: boodwesiiwaagba
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub: boodwesiimgoba

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+boodwe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: nboodwesiimnaaba
     2+boodwe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: gboodwesiimnaaba
     2+boodwe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: gboodwesiimwaaba
     1+boodwe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: nboodwesiimnaadig
     2+boodwe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: gboodwesiimnaadig
     2+boodwe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: gboodwesiimwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: boodwesiiwbaniin #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: boodwesiibniin   #book
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: boodwesiiwbaniig #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: boodwesiibniig  #book
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: boodwesiiwdigenan #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: boodwesiidgenan   #book
     boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: boodwesiiwdigenag #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: boodwesiidgenag  #book
